Missouri, session 2026, SB981.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 595.025, 595.035, and 595.045, RSMo,
are repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 595.025, 595.035, and 595.045, to read as
follows:
595.025. 1. A claim for compensation may be filed by
a person eligible for compensation or, if the person is an
incapacitated or disabled person, or a minor, by the
person's spouse, parent, conservator, or guardian.
2. A claim for compensation shall be filed not later
than two years after [the occurrence of the crime or the
discovery of the crime upon which it is based] any of the
following, whichever occurs later:
(1) The occurrence of the crime upon which the claim
is based;
(2) The discovery of the crime upon which the claim is
based;
(3) The filing of criminal charges relating to the
claimant's claim for compensation; or
(4) The conviction of a crime relating to the
claimant's claim for compensation.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 981 2
Notwithstanding the foregoing, a claim filed by a victim of
an offense under sections 566.030, 566.031, 566.032,
566.034, 566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067,
566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.093,
566.095, 566.100, 566.101, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, or
568.020, may be brought at any time.
3. Each claim shall be submitted to the department.
The department of public safety shall investigate such
claim, prior to the opening of formal proceedings. The
claimant shall be notified of the date and time of any
hearing on such claim. In determining the amount of
compensation for which a claimant is eligible, the
department shall consider the facts stated on the
application filed pursuant to section 595.015, and:
(1) Need not consider whether or not the alleged
assailant has been apprehended or brought to trial or the
result of any criminal proceedings against that person;
however, if any person is convicted of the crime which is
the basis for an application for compensation, proof of the
conviction shall be conclusive evidence that the crime was
committed;
(2) Shall determine the amount of the loss to the
claimant, or the victim's survivors or dependents;
(3) Shall determine the degree or extent to which the
victim's acts or conduct provoked, incited, or contributed
to the injuries or death of the victim.
4. The claimant may present evidence and testimony on
his own behalf or may retain counsel. The department of
public safety may, as part of any award entered under
sections 595.010 to 595.075, determine and allow reasonable
attorney's fees, which shall not exceed fifteen percent of
the amount awarded as compensation under sections 595.010 to

SB 981 3
595.075, which fee shall be paid out of, but not in addition
to, the amount of compensation, to the attorney representing
the claimant. No attorney for the claimant shall ask for,
contract for or receive any larger sum than the amount so
allowed.
5. The person filing a claim shall, prior to any
hearing thereon, submit reports, if available, from all
hospitals, physicians, surgeons, or other health care
providers who treated or examined the victim for the injury
for which compensation is sought. A hospital, physician,
surgeon, or other health care provider may submit reports on
behalf of the person filing a claim. If, in the opinion of
the department of public safety, an examination of the
injured victim and a report thereon, or a report on the
cause of death of the victim, would be of material aid, the
department of public safety may appoint a duly qualified,
impartial physician to make such examination and report.
6. Each and every payment shall be exempt from
attachment, garnishment or any other remedy available to
creditors for the collection of a debt.
7. Payments of compensation shall not be made directly
to any person legally incompetent to receive them but shall
be made to the parent, guardian or conservator for the
benefit of such minor, disabled or incapacitated person.
595.035. 1. For the purpose of determining the amount
of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to
595.075, the department of public safety shall, insofar as
practicable, formulate standards for the uniform application
of sections 595.010 to 595.075, taking into consideration
the provisions of sections 595.010 to 595.075, the rates and
amounts of compensation payable for injuries and death
pursuant to other laws of this state and of the United

SB 981 4
States, excluding pain and suffering for any claimant other
than a victim of a crime, and the availability of funds
appropriated for the purpose of sections 595.010 to
595.075. All decisions of the department of public safety
on claims pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075 shall be
in writing, setting forth the name of the claimant, the
amount of compensation and the reasons for the decision.
2. The crime victims' compensation fund is not a state
health program and is not intended to be used as a primary
payor to other health care assistance programs, but is a
public, quasi-charitable fund whose fundamental purpose is
to assist victims of violent crimes through a period of
financial hardship, as a payor of last resort. Accordingly,
any compensation paid pursuant to sections 595.010 to
595.075 shall be reduced by the amount of any payments,
benefits or awards received or to be received as a result of
the injury or death:
(1) From or on behalf of the offender;
(2) Under private or public insurance programs,
including Tricare, Medicare, Medicaid and other state or
federal programs, but not including any life insurance
proceeds; or
(3) From any other public or private funds, including
an award payable pursuant to the workers' compensation laws
of this state.
3. In determining the amount of compensation payable,
the department of public safety shall determine whether,
because of the victim's consent, provocation, incitement or
negligence, the victim contributed to the infliction of the
victim's injury or death, and shall reduce the amount of the
compensation or deny the claim altogether, in accordance
with such determination; provided, however, that the

SB 981 5
department of public safety may disregard the responsibility
of the victim for his or her own injury where such
responsibility was attributable to efforts by the victim to
aid a victim, or to prevent a crime or an attempted crime
from occurring in his or her presence, or to apprehend a
person who had committed a crime in his or her presence or
had in fact committed a felony.
4. In determining the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, monthly Social
Security disability or retirement benefits received by the
victim shall not be considered by the department as a factor
for reduction of benefits.
595.045. 1. There is established in the state
treasury the "Crime Victims' Compensation Fund". A
surcharge of [seven] ten dollars [and fifty cents] shall be
assessed as costs in each court proceeding filed in any
court in the state in all criminal cases including
violations of any county ordinance or any violation of
criminal or traffic laws of the state, including an
infraction and violation of a municipal ordinance; except
that no such fee shall be collected in any proceeding in any
court when the proceeding or the defendant has been
dismissed by the court or when costs are to be paid by the
state, county, or municipality. A surcharge of [seven] ten
dollars [and fifty cents] shall be assessed as costs in a
juvenile court proceeding in which a child is found by the
court to come within the applicable provisions of
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the moneys collected by clerks of the courts
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall be collected and disbursed in accordance with sections

SB 981 6
488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable to the director of
the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the
amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the state
forensic laboratory account administered by the department
of public safety to provide financial assistance to defray
expenses of crime laboratories if such analytical
laboratories are registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Agency or the Missouri department of health and
senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public
safety to the crime laboratories serving the courts of this
state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis
of blood, breath or urine in relation to a court proceeding.
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of
this section shall be denoted to the payment of an annual
appropriation for the administrative and operational costs
of the office for victims of crime and, if a statewide
automated crime victim notification system is established
pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of
expenditures actually incurred in the operation of such
system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first
of each month, the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds

SB 981 7
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee
shall at least monthly report the moneys paid pursuant to
this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and
the services to victims fund to the department of public
safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be collected
and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020.
Five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city
treasury of the city from which such funds were collected.
The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be
payable to the director of revenue. The funds received by
the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection shall be
distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall determine the
balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
available to satisfy the amount of compensation payable
pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075, excluding sections
595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first
of each month the director of revenue or the director's
designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds
available to the credit of the crime victims' compensation
fund and fifty percent to the services to victims' fund
established in section 595.100.
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by
the Missouri state auditor. Such audit shall include all

SB 981 8
records associated with crime victims' compensation funds
collected, held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section, the court shall enter a
judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the
crime victims' compensation fund, of [sixty-eight] one
hundred dollars upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt
for a class A or B felony; [forty-six] eighty dollars upon a
plea of guilty or finding of guilt for a class C, D, or E
felony; and [ten] forty dollars upon a plea of guilty or a
finding of guilt for any misdemeanor under Missouri law
except for those in chapter 252 relating to fish and game,
chapter 302 relating to drivers' and commercial drivers'
license, chapter 303 relating to motor vehicle financial
responsibility, chapter 304 relating to traffic regulations,
chapter 306 relating to watercraft regulation and licensing,
100 and chapter 307 relating to vehicle equipment regulations.
101 Any clerk of the court receiving moneys pursuant to such
102 judgments shall collect and disburse such crime victims'
103 compensation judgments in the manner provided by sections
104 488.010 to 488.020. Such funds shall be payable to the
105 state treasury and deposited to the credit of the crime
106 victims' compensation fund.
107 9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall
108 maintain records of all dispositions described in subsection
109 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment has
110 been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of
111 Missouri in accordance with this section; all payments made
112 on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
113 judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not
114 collected. These records shall be subject to audit by the
115 state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such

SB 981 9
116 funds shall report separately the amount of dollars
117 collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
118 offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections
119 or services to victims collections.
120 10. The department of revenue shall maintain records
121 of funds transmitted to the crime victims' compensation fund
122 by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
123 subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate
124 records of collection for alcohol-related offenses.
125 11. The state courts administrator shall include in
126 the annual report required by section 476.350 the circuit
127 court caseloads and the number of crime victims'
128 compensation judgments entered.
129 12. All awards made to injured victims under sections
130 595.010 to 595.105 and all appropriations for administration
131 of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except sections 595.050 and
132 595.055, shall be made from the crime victims' compensation
133 fund. Any unexpended balance remaining in the crime
134 victims' compensation fund at the end of each biennium shall
135 not be subject to the provision of section 33.080 requiring
136 the transfer of such unexpended balance to the ordinary
137 revenue fund of the state, but shall remain in the crime
138 victims' compensation fund. In the event that there are
139 insufficient funds in the crime victims' compensation fund
140 to pay all claims in full, all claims shall be paid on a pro
141 rata basis. If there are no funds in the crime victims'
142 compensation fund, then no claim shall be paid until funds
143 have again accumulated in the crime victims' compensation
144 fund. When sufficient funds become available from the fund,
145 awards which have not been paid shall be paid in
146 chronological order with the oldest paid first. In the
147 event an award was to be paid in installments and some

SB 981 10
148 remaining installments have not been paid due to a lack of
149 funds, then when funds do become available that award shall
150 be paid in full. All such awards on which installments
151 remain due shall be paid in full in chronological order
152 before any other postdated award shall be paid. Any award
153 pursuant to this subsection is specifically not a claim
154 against the state, if it cannot be paid due to a lack of
155 funds in the crime victims' compensation fund.
156 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as
157 provided in this section and such sum, or any part thereof,
158 remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any
159 disbursement, payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or
160 other transfer of money from the state of Missouri to such
161 defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such
162 judgment. Such amount shall be paid forthwith to the crime
163 victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such judgment
164 shall be entered on the court record. Under no
165 circumstances shall the general revenue fund be used to
166 reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The
167 director of the department of corrections shall have the
168 authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation fund
169 from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed
170 by the offender to the crime victims' compensation fund,
171 provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount owed
172 to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the
173 department of corrections.
174 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds
175 in the crime victims' compensation fund shall be paid into
176 the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
177 general revenue of this state.

SB 981 11
178 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim
179 or false statement in connection with any claim hereunder is
180 guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
181 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions
182 for the benefit of crime victims. Such gifts and
183 contributions shall be credited to the crime victims'
184 compensation fund as used solely for compensating victims
185 under the provisions of sections 595.010 to 595.075.
✓